tables/ph-g2.ctb
# liblouis: Filipino Braille Code (Grade 2)
#
# -----------
#-name: Filipino braille, grado 2
#-index-name: Filipino, contracted
#-display-name: Filipino contracted braille
#
#+language: fil
#+language: tlg
#+type: literary
#+contraction: full
#+grade: 2
#+direction: forward
#+system: fbc
#+version: 2014
#
#  Referenced documentation of Filipino Braille code at: http://liblouis.io/braille-specs/filipino/
#
#  Copyright (C) 2023 Allan Mesoga allan.mesoga@deped.gov.ph
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#  Maintained by Allan R. Mesoga allan.mesoga@deped.gov.ph
# Reviewed by Joyce C. Lopez lopezjoyce883@gmail.com

include en-ueb-g1.ctb

# Delimiters

multind 56-6 nocontractsign capsletter

seqdelimiter -—
seqdelimiter ‐   \x2010
seqdelimiter ‑   \x2011
seqdelimiter –   \x2013
seqdelimiter —   \x2014
seqdelimiter ―   \x2015

seqbeforechars ([{"“'‘
seqafterchars  )]}"”'’.,;:.!?…
seqafterpattern 'd
seqafterpattern 'll
seqafterpattern 're
seqafterpattern 's
seqafterpattern 't
seqafterpattern 've
seqafterpattern ’d
seqafterpattern ’ll
seqafterpattern ’re
seqafterpattern ’s
seqafterpattern ’t
seqafterpattern ’ve
#TODO:  all caps words (see lou_translateString.c:inSequence()
seqafterpattern 'D
seqafterpattern 'LL
seqafterpattern 'RE
seqafterpattern 'S
seqafterpattern 'T
seqafterpattern 'VE
seqafterexpression '([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E)
seqafterpattern ’D
seqafterpattern ’LL
seqafterpattern ’RE
seqafterpattern ’S
seqafterpattern ’T
seqafterpattern ’VE
seqafterexpression ’([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E)

#   7  Punctuation
#  - 7.1.3  could be read as contraction
match %[^_]|%[^_~]%<*[([{] ; %[^_]|[)}\\]]%>*%[^_~] 56-23
#     or a word-initial groupsign
match %[^_~]%<* . %a 56-256
match %[^_~]%<* : %a 56-25
match %[^_~]%<* ; %a 56-23

#   10.1   Alphabetic Wordsigns
#   - 10.1.1   standing alone
#   - 10.1.2   followed by 'd, 'll, 're, 's, 't, 've and standing alone
#   - 2.6.4

#   must be before contractions?
match %[^_~]%<* sa (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1356
match %[^_~]%<* bakit (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 12
match %[^_~]%<* kanya (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 14
match %[^_~]%<* dahil (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 145
match %[^_~]%<* paano (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 124
match %[^_~]%<* gaano (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1245
match %[^_~]%<* hindi (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 125
match %[^_~]%<* ito (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1346
match %[^_~]%<* ikaw (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 24
match %[^_~]%<* hakbang (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 245
match %[^_~]%<* kaya (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 13
match %[^_~]%<* lamang (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 123
match %[^_~]%<* mga (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 134
match %[^_~]%<* ngayon (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1345
match %[^_~]%<* para (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1234
match %[^_~]%<* kailan (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 12345
match %[^_~]%<* rin (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1235
match %[^_~]%<* sang-ayon (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 234
match %[^_~]%<* tayo (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 2345
match %[^_~]%<* upang (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 136
match %[^_~]%<* bagaman (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1236
match %[^_~]%<* wala (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 2456
match %[^_~]%<* yaman (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 13456

contraction b
contraction c
contraction d
contraction f
contraction g
contraction h
contraction i
contraction j
contraction k
contraction l
contraction m
contraction n
contraction p
contraction q
contraction r
contraction s
contraction t
contraction u
contraction v
contraction w
contraction x
contraction y
contraction z

contraction B
contraction C
contraction D
contraction F
contraction G
contraction H
contraction I
contraction J
contraction K
contraction L
contraction M
contraction N
contraction P
contraction Q
contraction R
contraction S
contraction T
contraction U
contraction V
contraction W
contraction X
contraction Y
contraction Z

# Strong Wordsign

match %[^_~]%<* ako (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 246
match %[^_~]%<* anak (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 156
match %[^_~]%<* araw (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 345
match %[^_~]%<* at (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 3456
match %[^_~]%<* ay (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 12346
match %[^_~]%<* hanggang (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 12356
match %[^_~]%<* ibig (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 34
match %[^_~]%<* kanila (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 16
match %[^_~]%<* maging (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 146
match %[^_~]%<* na (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 23456
match %[^_~]%<* naging (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1246
match %[^_~]%<* tunay (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1256


# Strong Groupsign

always an 156
always ang 2346
always ar 345
always aw 246
always en 26
always er 12456
always han 12356
always in 35
always mahal 123456
always mag 146
always nag 1246
always ng 126
always pag 1456
always tu 1256

# Beginning and Middle

begmidword ba 23
begmidword ka 25
begmidword da 256
begmidword pa 235

# Lower Word

lowword ba 23
lowword ka 25
lowword pa 235

# Middle of Word

midword ha 236
midword ga 2356
midword umi 356

# Beginning of Word

begword kina 36
begword napaka 4-1345
begword pinaka 4-1234

# Miscellaneous
# Word or End of Word

prfword ban 12-156
prfword baw 12-246
prfword gan 1245-156

# Miscellaneous
# Part Word

partword kara 25-1235-1

# Miscellaneous
# Always

always bang 12-2346
always batang 23-2345-2346
always bar 12-345
always dang 145-2346
always dar 145-345
always gang 1245-2346
always inin 35-24-1345
always kar 13-345
always karan 25-1235-156
always manana 134-1-45-1345
always manganga 134-1-45-126
always mangungu 134-1-46-126
always nanganga 1345-1-45-126
always nangungu 1345-1-46-126
always par 1234-345
always wawasto 2456-1-5-2456

# Miscellaneous
# End of Word

endword bat 12-3456
endword hat 125-3456
endword gat 1245-3456
endword pat 1234-3456

# Miscellaneous
# Stand Alone 

match %[^_~]%<* bat (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 12-1-2345
match %[^_~]%<* hat (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 125-1-2345
match %[^_~]%<* gat (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1245-1-2345
match %[^_~]%<* gata (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1245-1-2345-1
match %[^_~]%<* kara (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 25-1235-1
match %[^_~]%<* kanyang (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 14-126
match %[^_~]%<* tata (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 2345-1-2345-1
match %[^_~]%<* tatae (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 2345-1-2345-1-15
match %[^_~]%<* kanilang (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 16-126
match %[^_~]%<* paa (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1234-1-1
match %[^_~]%<* pat (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1234-1-2345
match %[^_~]%<* tayong (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 2345-126
match %[^_~]%<* ugaling (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 5-136-126

# Dot ffive Words

always alam 5-12346
always binata 5-12
always dalaga 5-145
always ewan 5-15
always hapon 5-125
always isip 5-24
always halaman 5-245
always kailangan  5-13
always larawan  5-123
always mabuti  5-134
always noon 5-1345
always opo 5-135
always patuloy 5-1234
always kislap 5-12345
always roon 5-1235
always sabi 5-156
always sinta 5-34
always subalit 5-234
always talaga 5-2345
always ugali 5-136
always buhay 5-1236
always wasto 5-2456
always eksamin 5-1346
always ayaw 5-13456
always salita 5-1356

# Middle and End of Word

midendword at 3456
midendword ing 346
midendword syon 4-234
midendword siyon 4-1356

# Short Form Words
# LetterB

match %[^_~]%<* babae (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 12-12
match %[^_~]%<* bulag (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 12-123
match %[^_~]%<* braille (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 12-1235-123

# Letter D

match %[^_~]%<* damdamin (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 145-145
match %[^_~]%<* datapwat (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 145-2456-2345
match %[^_~]%<* dapat (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 256-1234

# Letter H

match %[^_~]%<* halimbawa (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 125-1-123
match %[^_~]%<* halos (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 125-123
match %[^_~]%<* oras (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 125-1235

# Letter I

match %[^_~]%<* isang (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 24-234
match %[^_~]%<* inaasahan (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 35-234

# Letter K

match %[^_~]%<* kalayaan (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 13-123
match %[^_~]%<* kasalukuyan (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 13-234
match %[^_~]%<* kasaysayan (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 13-234-13456
match %[^_~]%<* karanasan (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 13-1235
match %[^_~]%<* karapatan (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 13-1234
match %[^_~]%<* kundi (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 13-145
match %[^_~]%<* kung (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 13-1245
contraction kg
contraction KG
match %[^_~]%<* kultura (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 13-2345-1235
match %[^_~]%<* kuwento (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 13-2456

# Letter L

match %[^_~]%<* lalaki (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 123-123
match %[^_~]%<* lipunan (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 123-1234-1345

# Letter M

match %[^_~]%<* magiging (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 146-1245
match %[^_~]%<* marahil (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 134-345
match %[^_~]%<* marami (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 134-1235
contraction mr
contraction MR
match %[^_~]%<* mamamayan (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 134-134
contraction mm
contraction MM

# Letter N

match %[^_~]%<* nagiging (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1246-1245

# Letter P

match %[^_~]%<* pagiging (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1456-1245
match %[^_~]%<* palaisipan (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1234-123
match %[^_~]%<* palibhasa (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1234-125
contraction ph
contraction PH
match %[^_~]%<* pamahalaan (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1234-134
contraction pm
contraction PM
match %[^_~]%<* pangungusap (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1234-234-1234
contraction psp
contraction PSP
match %[^_~]%<* panitikan (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1234-1345

# Letter S

match %[^_~]%<* sangguni (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 234-1245
contraction sg
contraction SG
match %[^_~]%<* suliranin (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 234-123
match %[^_~]%<* samantala (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 234-134
contraction sm
contraction SM
match %[^_~]%<* salawikain (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 234-2456

# Letter T
